frescobaldi/hyphdicts/hyph_id_ID.dic
ISO8859-1
a1a
a1a2t1
a1bad
a1ba1di1
a1bah
a1ba2h1a2n1
a1bai1
a1baik
a1bai1ma1na
a1bar
a1bar1an
a1ba2t1  % [sah]a-bat
a1ba3t2o1ar
ab1das
ab1d2i1
ab1d2o
ab1d2u
a1be
a1be1ra1s2i
a1bi
a2b1ja2d1
a2b1ja3d2i1ah
ab1l
ab1lep
a1bo
ab1r
ab3r4a
ab1ro1s2fer
ab1s
ab1sa2h1
ab1se2n1
ab1se2s1
ab1so2r1ben
ab1so2r2p1si
ab1stai2n1
ab1strak
ab1surd1
a1bu
a1bu1an
a1bu2h1
a1bu2ng3
a1ca
a1cah1
a1ca2k1
a1can1
a1can2g
a1ca2p1
a1ca1ra
a1ca1ra1kan
a1ce
a1ci
a1co
a1cu
a1cu2h1
a1cu2m1
a1da
a1da2b1
a1daks
a1da1lah
a1da2t1
a1de
a1de1gan1
a1di
1adi2l1
a1do
ado2n1
a1dop1si
a1du
a1du2k1
a1du2n1
a1du2n2g
a1du3n2ya
a1e
a2e1ro1
a2e1ro2b
a2e1ro3ba
a2e1ro3bik
a1fa
a1fe
a1fi
a1fik2s
a1fo
a1fu
a1ga
a1ga1ma1
a1ge
a1ge2n1
a1ge3n2e
a1ge2n2s
a1gi
a1gi2h1
a1go
ag1r
ag1ra
a1g2ram
ag1re1
ag1re1si
ag1re1si2f1
ag1re2s1tal
ag1ro1
ag1ro1no1mi
ag1ro2s1
a1gu
a1gul
.a1gun1an
a1gu2n2g1
a1ha
a1hami21l
a1he
a1hi
a1hi2r1
a1ho
a1hu
ai
a1i2b1
a1i2r1
a1it
a2i1tam
a1ja
a1ja1i2b1
a1ja2k1
a1ja2m1
a1ja3m2u
a1ja2r1
a1je
a1ji
a1jo
a1ju
a1ka
a1ka2i
a1ka3id
a1ka2l1
a1ka3l2a
a1ka2n1
a1ka2n2g1
a1ka3n2ya
a1ka2r1
a1ka3r2ang
a1ka2s1
a1ka3s2i
a1ke
1a1khi2r1
a1khi3r2at
a1khi3r2u
a1khi3r2u1sa1
a1ki
ak1l
ak3la
ak1li1
a1ko
a1ko1mo1
a1kr
a2k1ra2b1
a2k1re1
a2k1re1di1ta1
a2k1ri1
a2k1ri2f
a3k2ri1t
a2k1ro1
a2k1ro1ni2m1
ak1s
ak1sa3r4a
ak1se1
ak1se2n
ak1se2p1
ak1se2s
ak1se3so1
ak1t
ak1ti2f1
ak1tu1a
ak1tu1a2l1
ak1tu1a3l2i1
a1ku
a1ku1a
a1ku1a1tik
a1ku1pu
a1ku1punk1
a1ku2r1
a1ku3r2a
a1ku4r3an
a1ku5r4ang
a1ku2r1i
a1ku3r2i1k
a1ku1sa
a1ku1sa1tif
a1la
a1la2h1
a1la2i1
a1la1mah
a1la1mak
a1la2m1an1
a1la3m2an1da
a1la1mas
a1la1mat1
a1la1ma1t2ul
a1lam1i
a1la1m2i1ah
a1la1m2in
a1la2m3i1nya
a1la2ng1
a1la2p1
a1la3p2e
a1la2r1
a1la2r2m
a1la2s1
a1la2s3i
a1la2t1
al1b
al1ba1
al1ba2s
a1le
a1le1gro
a1le1man
alf
al1fa
al1fe
al1fu
a1li
a1li1e
ali1fa
ali2f1an
ali2h1
ali2m1an
ali3m2an1t
a1li1nea
a1li2ng1
a1li3ng2u
a1li2p1
a1li3p2un
a1li2r3
al1ja1
al1ju
al1l2a2h1
al1l2a3h2u
a1lo
al1t
al1ta1si
al1to1st2ra
a1lu
alun1an
a1lu2p1
a1lur1
a1ma
a1ma1bak1
a1m2ag
a1mal1an
a1mal1ga2m1
a1mal1ga3m2a1si
a1mal1ga3m2a1tor
a1mal1i
a1ma1l2i1ah
a1ma2n1an
a1ma3n2a2t1
a1ma2ng1
a1ma2r1an
a1mat1
a1ma1t2a
a1ma2t3an
ama1t2ir1
ama1t2ir1is1me
a1ma1t2o
am1b
am1ba2h1
a2m1ba2i1
a2m1ba2i3kan
am1ba2l1
am1ba3l2ang
a2m1ba2ng1
am1be2k1
a2m1bi2l1
a2m1bi2l1i
a2m1bi3l2i1ngu
a2m1bi2n1
a2m1bi2n2g1
a2m1bi3n2ya
a2m1b2las
a2m1bru2k1
am1bu1lans
am1bu1la1to1ri
am1bu2ng3
am1bur1
am1bu1r2a1dul
am1byar
a1me
a1men1sa1li1
a1me1ri1si1um
a1mi
1amin1i
ami1n2i1sa
a1mi1no
ami1rul1
1a1mi2t1
a1mo
am1p
a2m1pa2i1
am1pa2k1
a2m1pe1la2s3
am1pi2l1
a2m1plo2p1
a2m1prok
a2m1prung
a2m1pu
a2m1pu2h1
a2m1pu2n1
a2m1pu2t1
a2m1pu3t2a1si
a1mu
1a1muk
1a1muk1an
a1na
a1na1ba
a2n1ae1
a1na1f
a2n1a2f1r
a2na1gl
a1na2h1
a1nai
a1na1i1n
a1na2k1
a1na3k2o
a1na3k2u
a1n2a1li
a1n2a1li1sa
a1n2a1li1si2s1
a1n2a1log
a1n2a1lo1gi
a1na2m1
a1na2m1an %[t]anaman
a1na3m2or1fo
a1na3m2u
a1na2s1
a1na3s2ir
an1ca
an1cai
an1ca2m1
an1cang1
an1ca2p1
an1co1a
an1col
an1cuk
an1d
an1dai
an1dal1an
an1da1ta1ng2a2n1  %[t]anda-tangan
an1de2r
an1de3ro
an1dro1
an1du2h1
a1ne
a1n2e2h1
a1n2e1ka
a1n2e2k1sa
a1n2e2u1
a1n2e2u1plo1id
ang1
.a1ng2an
ang1g
ang1ga2h1
ang1ga2l1
ang1ga2p1
ang1ga2r1
ang1ga3r2a
ang1ga4r3an
ang1ger1ka
ang1gi2t1
ang1gla2p1
ang1go1ro1ka1sih
ang1gre2k1
ang1gu2k1
ang1gu2n1
ang1gu2n2g1
ang1gu3n2ya
ang1gur
a1ng2i2n1
a1ng2i3n2a
a1ng2i4n3an
a1ngis3i
ang1k
ang1ka1ra
ang1ka2t1
ang1k2lung
ang1ku2h1
ang1ku2t1
a1ngo1
a1ng2o1la
a1ngo2n1
a1ngo2p1
a1ngor
a1ngo2t1
ang1s
3ang1su2r1
a1ngur
a1ng2u1ru
a1ngut
a1ni
an1i1on
an1i1ri1
an1i1sei1
an1i1so
an1j
an1ja2k1
an1ja2l1
an1jlok
an1ju2r1
a1no
a2n1or1
a2n2o1r2ak
a2n2o1r2ek
an1t
an1ta1ke
an1ta2n2g1an
an1ta1r2a1
an1ta2r3a2n
an1ta3r4a3nya
an1ta3ri
an1ta3r2ik
an1te2p1
an1te1ra
an1te1ro
an1ti2h1
an1ti3h2is1
an1ti2k1
an1ti3k2a
an1ti3k2li
an1ti3k2lo
an1ti3k2o
an1ti3k2ri
an1ti3k2u
an1ti3p
an1ti3pi1
an1ti3pru1
an1traks
a1n2u
a1n2u1ge1ra2h1
a1nu1lir
a1nu2t1
a1nya1
a1nya2m1
a1nyamu
a1nya2ng
a1nya2r
a1nyi2r
a1o
a1pa
a1pak
ap1an
a1p2a1na1se
apany
a1par1te1men
a3p2ar1te1me2n1i
a1par1to1tel
a1pe
a1pen1d
a1pen1diks
a1pi
a1pi2k1
a1pi3k2al
a1pi2k2an  % a-pi-kan + a-pik-an
a1pi3k2u
a1pi2t1
a1pi3t2a
a1pi4t3an
ap1k
ap1ki2r1
ap1ki2r1an
ap1l
ap3la
ap3la1us
a3p2lo
ap3lu2s1
a1po
a1po1kri
ap1r
ap3ri
ap3ron
a1pu
a1p2ung1
a1pu2r1
a1qa
a1qe
a1qi
a1qo
a1qu
a1ra
a1ra2b1
a1ra3b2a1bu
a1ra3b2es
a1ra3b2i
a1ra2h1
a1ra1i
a1rak
a1rak1a
a1rak1an
ara1na
a1ras
a1re
a1rea
a1re1al
ar1g
a2r1gu
a1ri
a1ri2f1
a1ri3f2in
a1ri2s1
a1ri1te
a1ro1ma
a1ron1an
ar1s
ar1si2p1
ar1sir
ar1t
ar1ti1le1ri
ar1tis
ar1tis1an
a1ru
a1ruk
a1rum1ba
a1sa
a1sa2h1
a1sa2k1
a1sa2l1an
a1sa2m1
a1sa2p1
a1sa2r1
a1se
a1si
a1si1me2t1r
a1si2n1
a1si2n2g1
a1si2n2g1an
a1si3n2is
a1si3n2o
a1si3n2yor
a1si1ri
a1sis1te2m
a1sis1te2n1
as1k
as1ket %%
as1m
as1ma1ra
as1ma3r4a1ga
a1so
a1so1an
a1so2r1ti
as1p
as1pa2l1
as1pi1r
as1pi1ra1si
as1pi1ri2n
as1prak
as1t
as1ta3se
as1te1ro1id
as1tro1na2ut
as1tro1na2u1ti1ka
a1su
a1su2h1
a1su1ra
a1su3ran1si
a1syi2k1
a1ta
a1tak
at1an
a1t2ang
a1tas1a
a1ta1se
a1tas1i
a1te
a1te1nu
a1te1ret
a1ti
a1to
a3t2or
at3ra
a1tren
a2t1ri
a2t1ri1bu
a2t1ri1but
at3ro
at3ro1p
a1tu
atu2r1
au
a1u2m1
au1ra
au1rat
a1u2t1
au3t2a
a1u4t3an
a2u3t2e
a2u3t2i
a2u3t2o1
a2u3t2o1kr
a2u3t2o2p1si
a1va
a1ve
a1vi
a1vo
a1vu
a1wa
a1wa2l1
a1wa2m1
a1wa3m2i
a1wa3m2u
a1wa1na1ma
a1wa2r1
a1wa3r2a1cun
a1wa2s1
a1we
a1we2t1
a1wi
a1wo
a1wu
a1wu2r1
a1wu2t1
a1ya
a1ya2h1
a1ya1i
a1yak
a1yak1an
a1ya2l1
a1ya3l2ah
a1ya2m1
a1ya3m2u
a1ya2p1
a1ya3p2a1d
a1yar1
a1ye
a1yi
a1yo
a1yo2m1
a1yu
a1yu2m1
a1yu2n1
a1yu2ng
a1yu2t1
a1za
a1za1li
a1za2m1
a1ze
a1zi
a1zo
a1zu
ba1ba
ba1ba2k1
ba1ba2l1
ba1ba2t1
ba1bi
ba1bi2l1
bab1la2s1
ba1ca1
ba1ca2h1
ba1ca2k1
ba1ca3k2an
ba1ca2ng
ba1ca2r1
ba1co2k1
ba1cot
ba1da
ba1dai
ba1da2n1
ba1dan2g
ba1da3n2i
ba1do
ba1don2g
ba1ga
ba1gai1ma1na1
ba1gai1ma1na1kah
ba1gu
ba1gu2s1
ba1ha
ba1ha1ma
ba3h2a2n1
ba3h2a3n2a
ba3h2a4n3an
ba3h2a4n2g1
ba1has
ba3h2a1sa
ba1ha3s2a1m2u
ba1ha2s1an
ba1ha3s2a1nya
ba1ha1ya1
ba1he
ba1heu
bah1te1ra
ba1id
ba2i1du
bai1du1ri
1ba1i2k1
ba1in
ba2i1nah
ba1is
ba1i2t1
ba2i3t2ul
ba1ja1
ba1ja2j
ba1ja2n
ba1ja2u
ba1ji
ba1ji2k1
ba1ka
ba1ka2r1
ba1ka2t1
ba1ke1
ba1khil
ba1ki
ba1kir
bak1t
bak1te1r2i
ba1la
ba1lai1rung
ba1la2k1
ba1la2p1
ba1la1ten
ba1li
ba3l2i2k1an % ba-lik-an: lihat [me]m-ba-lik
ba1li2k1i
ba1lis1tik
ba1lis1ti1ka
ba1lo
ba1lo2k1
ba1lu
ba1lu2h1
ba1lu2i1
ba1lu2t1
ban1ca2k1
ban1ca2r1
ban1ce2t1
ban1ci
ban1cu2h1
ban1cu2t1
ban1d
ban1da2r1
ban1da3r2a
ban1da4r3an
ban1de1la
ban1de1ring
ban1di2t1
ban1du2l1
bang1
.ba1ngan
ba1ngar
ba1ng2as
ba1ng2at
ba1ng2au
ba1ng2et1
ban2g1ga1
ban2g1ga2n
ban2g1ga3nya
1bang1i
1bang1i1n
ba1ng2ir
.ba2ng1k
bangka2i
bangka2s1
bang1ki2r
bang1ki2t1
bangko2t1an
bang1kru2t1
ba1ngo
ba1ngor
ba1ng2un1
ba1ng2un1an
ba1ngus
ba1ni
ba3n2ir
ban1j
ban1ja4r1an
ban2k1
ban3k2i2r
ban1t
ban1ta2h1
ban1tai
ban1ta2l1
ban1ta2r1
ban1ta2r1an
ban1tu2n1
ban1tu3n2ya
ba1ny
ba1nya2k1
ba1nyo2l1
ba1pa1
ba1pa2k1
ba1pa3k2u
ba1pa2n1da
ba1pa2ng
ba1pa1nya
bap1ti2s1
ba1r2a
ba1r2ai
ba1r2a1k2a
ba1r2ang1
ba1r2ang1ka1li
ba1ra2t1
bar1b
bar1ba2r1
bar1ba4r3is
ba1ri
ba1ri4ng1
ba3r2i2s1
ba1ro
ba1ro1skop
ba1ru
ba1ru2s1
ba1ru2t1
ba1sa
ba1sa1li1
ba1si
ba3sit
ba1ta
ba1ta2l
ba1ta3li1on
ba5t4a2n2g
ba1t2a2ng1an
ba1ti
ba3t2i2k1
ba1ti2n1
ba1ti1pl
ba1tir
ba2t1ros
bau
ba1ud
ba1uk
ba2uk1sit
ba1u2n1
ba1u2n2g
ba2u3n2ya
ba1u2r1
ba1u3r2ek1sa
ba1u1s
ba1u1su1ku
ba1wa
ba1wa2h1
ba1wa1lah
ba1wa2ng1
ba1ya
ba1ya2r1
ba1yu
ba1yung
b1b
b1c
b1d
be1be
be1be2k1is
be1be2r1
be1be3r2as
be1bo
be1bo1do2r3an
be1ca2k1
be1da
be1da2k1
be1da3k2an
be1di2l1
be1din
be1do
be1do2l1
be1ga
be1ga2l1
be1ga1na
bei
be1ka
be1ka2l1
be1ka1t2ul
be1ku
be1ku3k2an
be1ku1ku
be1la
be1la1da
be1la2h1
be1la3h2ak
be1la2h1i
be1la3h2ong
be1lai
be1la1la2k1
be1la1nga
be1la2n1ja1
be1la2s1
be1la3s2ung1
be1le
be1le2k1
be1le2k1an
be1le3k2ek
be1le3k2ok
be1le1r
be1li
be1li2k1
be1li3k2at
be1li3k2u
be1lo
be1lo2k1
be1lo3k2ok
be1lon
be1lo2t1
be1lo3t2ong
be1lu
be1lu2r1
be1lu3r2u
be1na
be1na2h1
be1na2m1an
be1na2r1
be1na3r2a
be1na4r3an
ben1c
ben1ca1na
ben1ca1na1i
ben1d
ben1de1ra
ben1de1ra1i
ben1dir
ben1do1ro
ben1dung1
be1ngal
be1ngang
be1ng2a1wan
be1ngek
be1ngep
be1ngi2s1
beng1k
beng1ka2h1
beng1ka2k1
beng1ka1rak1
beng1ka1tak1
beng1ke2l1
beng1ke3l2ai
beng1ko2k1
be1ngoh
be1ngong
be1ngu
be1ngu2t1
be1ni
be1ni2h1
ben1jo2l1
ben1jut
ben1t
ben1ta2k1
ben1ta1la
ben1ta2ng1
ben1ta3ng2ur
ben1ta2r1
ben1ta3r2a
ben1ta4r3an
ben1tro2k1
ben1tu2k1
ben1tu2r1
be1nu
be1nu1a
be1nu1a1ron
be1nu2m1
ber1
be1r2a
be2r3a1b
be3r4a1be
be2r3a1d
be2r3a1f
be2ra1ga  % ber-a-ga + be-ra-ga
be2r3a1gah
be2r3a1gak
be3ra1gam
be4r3a1ga1ma
be3ra1gan
be2r3a1go1
be1rak
be2r3a1ka
be3r4a1kah
be2r3a1ku
be2r3a1l
be2r3a1ma2l1
be2r2a2m1bai  % ber-am-bai + be-ram-bai
be2r3a2m1bau
be2r3a2m1bi
be2r3a1n
be3r4a2n1da
be3r4a2ng1
be4r4a2ng1an      % ber-ang-an + ber-a-ngan
be5r4a3ng2as
be4r5a2ng1g
be4r5a3ng2i
be4r5a2ng1ka
be5r6a2ng1kal
be5r6a2ng1kan
be5r6a2ng1kat
be4r5a2ng1s
be5r6a2ng1sa
be3r4a1ni1
be2r3a2n1j
be3r4a2n1t
be3r4a2n1ta2s1
be1rap
be2r3a1pi
be2r3a1r
be2r3a2r1t
be1r2as1
be2r3a1s2a2l1
be2r3a1s2a2p1
be2r3a1s2a2s1
be2r3as1ra1ma
be1r2a2t1
be2r3a3t2ap1
be1r2a2t1i
be2r3a3w2a2l
be2r3a3w2a2n
be2r3a3w2a2s
be1r2e1del
be1r2ek
be2r3e1ko
be2r3ek1s
be1r2em1ba
be1r2en
be1r2en1d
be1r2eng
be1r2e1ngau
be1r2e1ngos
be1r2eng1se2k
be1r2e1o
be1r2i
be2r3i1b
be2r4i1bu %ber-ibu + be-ri-bu
be2r3i1j
be1r2i2k
be3r4i3kan
be2r3i3kat
be2r3i2kh
be2r3i2k1t
be2r3i3ku2t1
be2r3i2l1mu
be2r3i1m
be2r3i2m1b
be3r4i1mu
be3r4i1ngas
be3r4i1ngin
be2r3i1ngus
be2r3in1t
be2r3i1ra
be2r3i1ring
be2r3i1s
be3r4i1sik
be4r5i1si1kan
be2r3i2s1l
be2r3i2s1t
be2r3i1z
ber1ka
ber1ka2t1
ber1ka3t2a
ber1ka4t3an
ber1n
ber1ng2a
bero
be1r2o1ci
be1r2o1ga
be1r2ok
be2r3om1bak
be1r2on
be1r2o1nok
ber1sel
ber1si2h1
be1r2u1buh
be1r2u1du
be1r2u1i
be1r2u1ju
be2r3u1jung
be1r2uk
be2r3u1kir
be2r3u1ku2r1
be1r2um1bun
be1r2um1put
be1r2u1nang
be1r2u1ngut
be1r2un1tus
be1r2u1ri
be1r2us
be2r3u1sa
be2r3u1si
be1sa1len
be1sa2n1
be1sa2r1
be1se
be1se2l1
bes1t
bes1tel1an
bes1ti
bes1tir
be1su
be1suk
be3t2a
be1ta1hak
be1ta1tas
be1ti
be1ti1nga
be1tu
be1tu2l1
be1tung
b1f
b1g
b1h
bi1a
bi1a1di
bi1a2k1
bi1a1sa
bi1a2s1an
bi1a3s2a1nya
bi1a1ya1
bi1a1ya1kan
bi1bi
bi1bi2t1
bib1li1o1
bi1ca
bi1ca3r4a
bi1da
bi1da1da1ri
bi2d1ah
bi1da2n1
bi1da2n2g1
bi1da2s1
bi1du
bi1du1ri
bi1ga
bi1ga1ir
1bij
bi1ja
bi1ja2k1
bi1ja1na
bi1ki2n1
bi1ki3n2i
bi1kir
bi1kon1
bi1la
bi1la2s1
bi1la3s2i
bi1la1te1ral
bi3l2i
bi1lu
bi1lu2r1
bim1b
bim1bi2t1
bi1na
bi1na1ta2ng3
bin1d
bin1der
bi1ngas
bi1ngi
bing1k
bing1ka2i1
bing1ka1tak
bing1ki2s1
bi1ng2ung1
bin1t
bin1ta2ng3
bi1o1
bi1o1k2li1ma
bi1o1p
bi1o2p1si
bi1o1s2
bi1o1s2ko2p1
bi1pris
bi1ra
bi1ra2h1
bi1ri
bi1ro1
bi3r2o1kr
bi1ru
bi1se
bi1seps
bi1si
bi1si2k1
bi1si2ng3
bi1tra
bi2t1re
bi1u
bi1u2s1
b1j
b1k
b1l
b2l2a2k1
b2l2a2s1t
b2l2a2s1te2r3
ble1kek
blen1der
ble1wah
b2li1rik
b2lok
b2lo1kir
b2lu1da2k1
blues
b1m
b1n
bo1ba1to
bo1bo
bo1bo2l1
bo1bro2k1
bo1ca2h1
bo1co
bo1co2r1
bo1dhi
bo1do
bo1do2h1
bo1do2r1
bo1do2r1an
bo1ho
bo1hong1
bo2i1
bo3i2d
bo2i1ko2t3a2n
bo3i2s
bo3i3sa
bok2s
bok3se2
bok3su
bo1le1
bo1le2h1
bo2m1
bom1bar1de
bom1bar1dir
bom1bas1tis
bo3m2oh
bom1seks
bon1c
bon1ceng1
bo1ne1
bo1ne1ka1n2ya
bo1ne2t
bo1ng2ak
bong1go2l1
bong1k
bong1ka2h1
bong1krek
bo1ngo
bo2ng1s
bong1so2r
bon1s
bo1nyok
bop1lang
1bor1
1bo1r2a
bo1r2aks
bor1di2r1
bo1r2e
bor1go2l1
bo1r2i
1bo1r2o
bo1r2o2k1
1bo1r2o2s1
bo1sa2n1
bo1so
bo1sor
bo1ta
bo1ta2k1
bo1to
bo1to2l1
bot1ri1
bots1wa1na
bo1ya
bo1ya2k1
b1p
b1q
b1r
b2rai
bra1ki
bra1ki1a1si
bra1ni
bren1di
bri1ga1de
bri1ga1di2r
bri1ke2t1
bro1ko
bron1k
bron1ki1o
bro1no
bro1su2r1
brow1ser
bru1der
3b2ru1ta2l1
b1s
b1str
b1t
1bu
bu1a
1bu1a2h1
1bu1a2i1
1bu1a2k1
1bu1a2l1
1bu1a3na
1bu1ang1
1bu1a2s1
1bu1a2t1
bu1a1ya
bu1b
bu1ba2r3
bu1bu2h1
bu1bu2k1
bu1bu2t1
bu1da
bu1da2k1
bud1d2h
bu1ga2r1
buh1
bu3h2uk
bu3h2u2l1
bu3h2un
bui
bu1ih
bu1il
bu1j
bu1ju2k1
bu1ka
bu1ka1i
bu1ki2t1
bul
bu1la
bu1la2k1
bu1la2n1
bu1la2n2g1
bu1la2t1
bu1li
bu1li2r1
bu1lu
bu1lu2k1
bum1b
bum1bu
bum1bu1i
bum1bu2n1
bum1bu2n2g1
bun1bu2n1
bun1c
bun1ci2t1an
bun1d
bun1da2r1
bun1de2l1
1bung1
bu1ng2a1
bu1ng2a1i
bu1ng2a2n
bu1ng2a3nya
bu1ng2a2r1
bung1k
bung1ku2s1
bu1ng2ur
bun1t
bun1ti2l1
bun1tu2t1
1bu1nu2h1
bu1nu2t1
bu3n2yi
bu1ra
bu1ra1kan
bu1r2am
bu2r1an
bur1i
bu1r2ik
1bu1r2i2t1
bur1k
bur1ki1na
bu1ro2n3
bu1ru
bu1ru2h1
bu1ruj
bu1ru2k1
